Hawaii statutes.
§206E-31.5 Prohibitions. Anything
contained in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, the authority is
prohibited from:

(1) Selling or otherwise assigning the fee simple
interest in any lands in the Kakaako community development district to which
the authority in its corporate capacity holds title, except with respect to:

(A) Utility easements;

(B) Remnants as defined in section 171-52;

(C) Grants to any state or county department
or agency;

(D) Private entities for purposes of any
easement, roadway, or infrastructure improvements; or

(E) Reserved housing as defined in section
206E-101; or

(2) Approving any plan or proposal for any
residential development in that portion of the Kakaako community development
district makai of Ala Moana boulevard and between Kewalo Basin and the foreign
trade zone. [L 2006, c 317, §1; am L 2014, c 61, §9]

Revision Note

In paragraph (1)(C), "or" deleted pursuant to
§23G-15.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next